apertium-evn.evn-relaxed.lexc
LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-N-PL

%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>р POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<pl%>:%>р CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>р%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<pl-sal%>%<nom%>:%>с%{Э%}л POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<pl-sal%>:%>с%{Э%}л CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<pl-sal%>%<ins%>:%>с%{Э%}л%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-N

NOMINAL-INFL-N-SG ;
NOMINAL-INFL-N-PL ;

LEXICON N-N-SG

NOMINAL-INFL-N-SG ;
%<indposs%>:н%>ӈ%{i%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

LEXICON N-N-PL

NOMINAL-INFL-N-PL ;
%<indposs%>:н%>ӈ%{i%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

LEXICON N-N

N-N-SG ;
N-N-PL ;

LEXICON NOUN-N

%<n%>: N-N ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV-ETC ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>чик%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ;

LEXICON NOUN-N-SG

%<n%>: N-N-SG ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV-ETC ;
%<n%>%<child%>:%>чик%{Э%}%{ː%} N-N ;

LEXICON NOMINAL-INFL-RUS-N

%<sg%>%<nom%>: POSS-SG-N-CLITICS ;
%<sg%>: CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>%{i%}л POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<pl%>:%>%{i%}л CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>%{i%}л%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<pl-sal%>%<nom%>:%>с%{Э%}л POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<pl-sal%>:%>с%{Э%}л CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<pl-sal%>%<ins%>:%>с%{Э%}л%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;

LEXICON NOUN-RUS-N

%<n%>: NOMINAL-INFL-RUS-N ;
%<n%>: POSSESSION-EQUATION-ETC ;
%<n%>: INTS-ATTEN ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-CASES-P12            ! For 1st-person sg, pe (except pi) and 2nd-person sg, pl

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>э CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>эвэ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<locdir%>:%>иклэ%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<allprl%>:%>икли%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<ins%>:%>ди CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER          ! Except 3rd-person sg and pl

%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}лэ%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук CLITICS ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}ит%{д%} CLITICS ;
%<com-nun%>:%>нун CLITICS ;
%<com-gali%>:%>%{G%}%{Э%}ли CLITICS ;

PRON-PERS-POSS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-POSS

%<poss%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>ӈи%{ː%} CLITICS ;
%<poss%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:%>ӈи%{ː%}%>%{i%}т CLITICS ;
%<poss%>%<sg%>:%>ӈи%{ː%} CASE-OBL ;
%<poss%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л CLITICS ;
%<poss%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л%>%{i%}т CLITICS ;
%<poss%>%<pl%>:%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л CASE-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-POSS-3-SG-CASE-OBL

%<acc%>%<def%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<def%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%}%>н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<datloc%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<locall%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<all%>%<px3sg%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<prl%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<locdir%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<allprl%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<abl%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{D%}ук%>ин CLITICS ;
%<ela%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{G%}ид%>ин CLITICS ;
%<ins%>%<px3sg%>:ди%>н CLITICS ;
%<com-nun%>%<px3sg%>:%>нун%>ин CLITICS ;
%<com-gali%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{G%}%{Э%}ли%>ин PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX

%<px3pl%>:%>тын CLITICS ;
%<px3pl%>:%>тин CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PRON-PERS-POSS-3-PL-CASE-OBL

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ; ! Dir/LR
%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<allprl%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}иди PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<ins%>:ди PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<com-nun%>:%>нун PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<com-gali%>:%>%{G%}%{Э%}ли PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;

%<eqt-gačin%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чин POSS-SG-N-CLITICS ; !FIX
%<eqt-gačin%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чин CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>%<ins%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чин%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>%<pl%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чи%>р POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>%<pl%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чи%>р CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<eqt-gačin%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%{G%}%{Э%}чи%>р%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;

%<eqt-dyn%>:%{D%}ын CLITICS ;
%<eqt-dyn%>:%{D%}ын CASE-OBL ;
%<eqt-dyn%>%<ins%>:%{D%}ын%>ди CLITICS ;
%<eqt-dyn%>%<pl%>:%{D%}ы%>с%{Э%}л CLITICS ;
%<eqt-dyn%>%<pl%>:%{D%}ы%>с%{Э%}л CASE-OBL ;
%<eqt-dyn%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%{D%}ы%>с%{Э%}л%>%{i%}т%{д%} CLITICS ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-CASES

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Э%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>:%>эвэ POSS-SG-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<ind%>:%>%{ъ%}%{Е%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<all%>:%>тыки%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<locdir%>:%>икл%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<allprl%>:%>икли%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:%>гит POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:%>ит POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<com-nun%>:%>нун POSS-SG-N-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<com-gali%>:%>%{G%}%{Э%}ли POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ил POSS-PL-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>ил%>ди POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>ил CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<indposs%>:%>ӈи%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM

эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:эр POSS-SG-CLITICS ;	
эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<datloc%>:э%>ду%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;	
эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<locall%>:э%>лэ%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;	
эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<prl%>:э%>ли%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;	
эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:э%>дук POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
эр:эр PRON-DEM-CASES ;

тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:тар POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:тари POSS-SG-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<datloc%>:та%{ː%}%>ду%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;	
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<locall%>:та%{ː%}%>ла%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;	
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<prl%>:та%{ː%}%>ли%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;	
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:та%{ː%}%>дук POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
тар:тар PRON-DEM-CASES ;
тар:тари PRON-DEM-CASES ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PRON-ITG

экун%<prn%>%<itg%>:эку%{а%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:эку%{а%}н%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ;
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>:э%{а%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:э%{а%}%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>:а NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:а%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>:е%{ː%}ку%{а%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:е%{ː%}ку%{а%}н%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR

ӈи%{ː%}%<prn%>%<itg%>:ӈи%{ː%}%{э%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! add ӈие as plural
ӈи%{ː%}%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:ӈи%{ː%}%{э%}%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

ир%{ː%}%<prn%>%<itg%>:и%{ː%}р%{э%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS
бӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ми%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-P12 ;
бӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ми%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
сӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:си%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-P12 ;
сӣ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:си%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<poss%>%<sg%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%{ː%} PRON-PERS-POSS-3-SG-CASE-OBL ;
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<poss%>%<pl%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л PRON-PERS-POSS-3-SG-CASE-OBL ;
бӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pe%>:му%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-P12 ;
бӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pe%>:му%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>:ми%{э%}т PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
мит%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pi%>:му%{э%}т PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ; ! Dir/LR
сӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:су%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-P12 ;
сӯ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:су%{э%}н PRON-PERS-CASES-OTHER ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:нуӈар PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>%<def%>:нуӈар%>ва PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<datloc%>:нуӈар%>ду%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<locall%>:нуӈар%>дула%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<all%>:нуӈар%>тыки%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<prl%>:нуӈар%>дули%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<locdir%>:нуӈар%>икла%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<allprl%>:нуӈар%>икли%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:нуӈар%>дук PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:нуӈар%>гиди PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:нуӈар%>ди PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<com-nun%>:нуӈар%>нун PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<com-gali%>:нуӈар%>гали PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:нуӈар%>ӈи%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%<sg%>:нуӈар%>ӈи PRON-PERS-POSS-3-PL-CASE-OBL ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%{ː%} PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ; ! Dir/LR
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%<sg%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%{ː%} PRON-PERS-POSS-3-PL-CASE-OBL ; ! Dir/LR
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:нуӈар%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%<pl%>:нуӈар%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л PRON-PERS-POSS-3-PL-CASE-OBL ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ; ! Dir/LR
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<poss%>%<pl%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%{ː%}%>л PRON-PERS-POSS-3-PL-CASE-OBL ; ! Dir/LR
 LEXICON Nouns
а̄чин%<n-neg%>:а%{ː%}чи NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
а̄чин%<n-neg%>:а%{ː%}си NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
акӣн:аки%{ː%} NOUN-N-SG ; ! 
амӣн:ами%{ː%} NOUN-N-SG ; !
анӣн:ани%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
арапоркан:арапоркан%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
аэроплан:аэроплан%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
баласкан:баласка NOUN-N ; ! 
баритон:баритон%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
бирисен:бирисен%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
боярин:боярин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
бурган:бурга NOUN-N ; ! 
вазелин:вазелин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
воин:воин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
гириптын:гирипты NOUN-N ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
голосуин:голосуин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
графин:графин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
дадан:дада NOUN-N ; ! 
дукулан:дукула NOUN-N ; ! 
дюпкун:дюпку NOUN-N ; ! 
европаган:европаган%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
илачин:илачи NOUN-N ; ! 
ирувавун:ируваву NOUN-N ; ! 
истакан:истакан%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
каптасун:каптасу NOUN-N ; ! 
карабин:карабин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
картон:картон%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
колхогин:колхогин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
ко̄рган:ко%{ː%}рга NOUN-N ; ! 
кошкатка̄н:кошкатка%{ː%}н%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
курицатка̄н:курицатка%{ː%}н%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
кэнэ̄н:кэнэ%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
ле̄пе̄скэмэ̄н:ле%{ː%}пе%{ː%}скэмэ%{ː%}н%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
магасин:магасин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
маӈичан:маӈича NOUN-N ; ! 
микрофон:микрофон%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
муӈгумэкэн:муӈгумэкэ NOUN-N ; ! 
накан:накан%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
немин:неми NOUN-N ; ! 
нэӈэмэчин:нэӈэмэчи NOUN-N ; ! 
овун:ову NOUN-N ; ! 
отулавун:отулаву NOUN-N ; ! 
партизан:партизан%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
писто̄н:писто%{ː%}н%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
пляса̄тла̄н:пляса%{ː%}тла%{ː%}н%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
поторо̄н:поторо%{ː%}н%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
пулатка̄н:пулатка%{ː%}%{э%}н NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
рубин:рубин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian! couldn't find in freq_list
сапиян:сапия NOUN-N ; ! 
сахарин:сахарин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
соковун:сокову NOUN-N ; ! 
стакан:стакан%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
сэ̄мэкэн:сэ%{ː%}мэкэ NOUN-N ; ! 
таракан:таракан%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
тритон:тритон%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
туксавка̄нэн:туксавка%{ː%}нэ NOUN-N ; ! "бегство "
тыргакшан:тыргакша NOUN-N ; ! 
уксакун:уксаку NOUN-N ; ! 
ургэптун:ургэпту NOUN-N ; ! 
финн:фи%{а%}нн NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian! added from freq_list финнал
харун:хару NOUN-N ; ! "дурнота (головокружение)"
хуӈникэ̄н:хуӈникэ%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
хапиян:хапия NOUN-N ; ! 
хуелдын:хуелды NOUN-N ; ! 
чабан:чабан%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
чапчикун:чапчику NOUN-N ; ! 
чумбикэ̄н:чумбикэ%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
эвэрэ̄н:эвэрэ%{ː%} NOUN-N ; ! 
экӣн:эки%{ː%}н NOUN-N-SG ; !
энӣн:эни%{ː%} NOUN-N-SG  ; ! мать
юктулэн:юктулэ NOUN-N ; ! 
магазин:магазин%{☭%} NOUN-RUS-N ; ! from Russian
 LEXICON Verbs
эчин%<part-neg%>:эчи NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
